Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Part 6 General Powers of Banks
45-2-615. [Reserved.]

Every bank shall retain its business records for the periods that are or may be prescribed by or in accordance with the terms of this section.

Each bank shall retain for a period of seven (7) years the minute books of meetings of its stockholders and directors, capital stock ledger and capital stock certificates ledger or stubs, general ledger, daily statements of condition, general journal, investment ledger, and copies of bank examination reports.

All other bank records shall be retained for the periods that the commissioner shall, in accordance with the terms of this section, prescribe.

The commissioner shall, from time to time, issue regulations classifying all records kept by state banks and prescribing the period for which records of each class shall be retained. The periods may be permanent or for a lesser term of years. The regulations may from time to time be amended or repealed. Prior to issuing the regulations, the commissioner shall consider:

Actions at law and administrative proceedings in which the production of bank records might be necessary or desirable;

State and federal statutes of limitation applicable to the actions or proceedings;

The availability of information contained in bank records from other sources; and

Other matters that the commissioner deems pertinent, in order that the commissioner's regulations will require banks to retain their records for as short a period as is commensurate with the interests of bank customers and shareholders and of the people of this state in having bank records available.

Any bank may dispose of any record that has been retained for the period prescribed by or in accordance with the terms of this section for retention of records of its class, and shall thereafter be under no duty to produce the records in any action or proceeding.

Any bank may cause any or all records at any time in its custody to be reproduced and/or preserved by itself, or by any other person who agrees in writing to submit its operations to the examination of the commissioner, to the extent that the operations directly affect the recordkeeping, by any:

Microphotographic process;

Electronic and/or mechanical data storage technique; or

Any other means approved by the commissioner.

A record reproduced and/or preserved by a process, technique or means approved under subdivision (f)(1) shall have the same force and effect as the original record and be admitted into evidence equally with the original.

To the extent that they are not in contravention of any law of the United States, this section applies to all banks doing business in this state.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.251); 1973, ch. 294, § 6; T.C.A., § 45-445; Acts 2020, ch. 605, § 5.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment in (b), substituted “for a period of seven (7) years” for “permanently”, and substituted “capital stock ledger and capital stock certificates ledger or stubs, general ledger, daily statements of condition, general journal, investment ledger, and copies of bank examination reports” for “its capital stock ledger and capital stock certificates ledger or stubs, its general ledger, its daily statements of condition, its general journal, its investment ledger, its copies of bank examination reports, and all records that the commissioner shall, in accordance with the terms of this section, require to be retained permanently”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 605, § 10. March 20, 2020.

Cross-References. Applicability to industrial banks, §45-5-607.

45-2-617. [Reserved.]

Compliance with the requirements of the Truth in Savings Act, 12 U.S.C. § 4301 et seq., contained in the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation Improvement Act of 1991, (Pub. L. No. 102-242, 105 Stat. 2236, §§ 261-274), and applicable federal regulations shall be deemed compliance with any requirements of the laws and statutes of Tennessee relating to the disclosure of information in connection with deposit accounts.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), in the case of a nonrenewable certificate of deposit having a term of more than one (1) month but no longer than one (1) year, the bank shall provide a maturity notice that meets those requirements of the Truth in Savings Act, as to both timing and content, that would be applicable to the certificate if its term exceeded one (1) year. The bank's liability for failing to provide the maturity notice shall equal but not exceed that liability the bank would have incurred under the Truth in Savings Act had the certificate's term exceeded one (1) year.

Acts 1979, ch. 163, § 1; T.C.A., § 45-449; Acts 1981, ch. 312, §§ 1, 2; 1993, ch. 77, § 1.

45-2-619. Definitions — Electronic cash dispensing devices.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Depository institution” means:

An insured bank as defined in § 3 of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act (12 U.S.C. § 1813);

A mutual savings bank as defined in § 3 of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act;

An insured credit union as defined in § 101 of the Federal Credit Union Act (12 U.S.C. § 1752);

A member as defined in § 2 of the Federal Home Loan Bank Act (12 U.S.C. § 1422); a savings association as defined in § 3 of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act that is an insured depository institution as defined in the act; or

An association or entity that is wholly owned by or that consists only of institutions referred to in subdivisions (a)(1)(A)(i)-(iv); and

That:

Is domiciled in Tennessee;

Has a branch lawfully doing business in Tennessee pursuant to this part;

Is a federally chartered institution described in (a)(1)(A)(i)-(v); or

Is a state chartered institution described in (a)(1)(A)(i)-(v); provided, that the home state of the institution does not prevent or limit a Tennessee chartered institution's ability to own or operate similar devices in the home state. If the home state has those restrictions, then out-of-state institutions from the home state may own or operate to the same extent and under the same terms and conditions that would apply to a Tennessee institution in the home state; and

“Electronic cash dispensing device” means an electronic device other than a telephone operated by a consumer, through which a consumer may obtain cash by means of initiating an electronic fund transfer instruction to the consumer's depository institution to debit the consumer's deposit account. For purposes of this part, “electronic cash dispensing device” includes, but is not limited to, automated teller machines.

A person other than a depository institution may own or operate, alone or in combination with other persons, one (1) or more electronic cash dispensing devices located or to be located in this state; provided, that the electronic cash dispensing device does not receive money on deposit.

Acts 1995, ch. 165, § 5; 2001, ch. 54, § 16; 2014, ch. 540, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the preamble to the act concerning electronic cash dispensing services, please refer to Acts 2014, ch. 540.

Attorney General Opinions. Ownership of automatic teller machine, OAG 96-056, 1996 Tenn. AG LEXIS 70 (3/28/96).

45-2-620. Acceptance of deposits or placement in federally insured institutions — Deposits by state or other governmental entities.

A state or national bank or savings institution or savings bank may accept funds for deposit or placement in federally insured institutions, within or without the state; provided, that the bank has entered into a deposit agreement or deposit placement agreement with the depositor.

The depository may also enter into a custodial agreement with the customer to maintain any certificate of deposit or other evidences of the deposits so received or placed. Depositors for these purposes shall include the state or any governmental entity.

Acts 2005, ch. 432, § 3.